Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-3319
Petition; notice; protest.

When such petition is presented to the mayor and city council it shall be the duty of the mayor and city council to proceed as provided in sections 19-3312 and 19-3313 as upon the passage of a resolution for the creation of an offstreet parking district. The same procedure for publication of notice and objections to the creation of the district shall apply.

Laws 1967, c. 60, § 19, p. 206;

R.S.Supp.,1967, § 16-830;

Laws 1969, c. 88, § 19, p. 448.